Louisiana, session 2026, HB483.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 33:9091.23(G) is hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§9091.23. Faubourg Marigny Security and Improvement District
* * *
G. Additional contributions funding. (1)(a) The governing authority of the
city of New Orleans may levy and collect a sales and use tax within the boundaries
of the district not to exceed two percent.
(b) The tax shall be imposed by resolution of the board and shall be levied
upon the sale at retail, the use, the lease or rental, the consumption, the distribution,
and the storage for use or consumption of tangible personal property or digital
products and upon the sales of services within the boundaries of the district, all as
Page 1 of 4
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1045 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 483
defined in R.S. 47:301 et seq. However, the resolution imposing the tax shall be
adopted only after the proposition authorizing the levy of the tax is approved by a
majority of the qualified electors of the district voting on the proposition at an
election held for that purpose and conducted in accordance with the Louisiana
Election Code. The purpose and rate of the tax shall be as provided in the resolution.
(c) Except where inapplicable, the procedure established by R.S. 47:301 et
seq. shall be followed in the imposition, collection, and enforcement of the tax, and
procedural details necessary to supplement those Sections and to make them
applicable to the tax authorized in this Subsection shall be fixed in the resolution
imposing the tax.
(d) The tax shall be imposed and collected uniformly throughout the
jurisdiction of the district.
(e) The tax levied pursuant to this Subsection shall be in addition to all other
taxes other political subdivisions within the jurisdiction of the district are authorized
to levy and collect.
(2)(a) In addition to any other tax levied and collected, the governing
authority of the city of New Orleans may levy and collect a tax upon the paid
occupancy of hotel rooms located within the district. The hotel occupancy tax shall
not exceed two percent of the rent or fee charged for such occupancy.
(b) The word "hotel" as used in this Section shall have the same definition
as that contained in R.S. 47:301(6).
(c) The person who exercises or is entitled to occupancy of the hotel room
shall pay the hotel occupancy tax at the time the rent or fee for occupancy is paid.
"Person" as used in this Paragraph shall have the same definition as that contained
in R.S. 47:301(8).
(d) The hotel occupancy tax shall be in addition to all taxes levied upon the
occupancy of hotel rooms located within the district.
(e) The governing authority shall impose the tax by ordinance. However, the
ordinance imposing the tax shall be adopted by the governing authority only after a
Page 2 of 4
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1045 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 483
proposition authorizing the levy of the tax has been approved by a majority of the
electors of the district voting at an election held for that purpose in accordance with
the Louisiana Election Code.
(f) The governing authority may enter into a contract with any public entity
authorized to collect sales or use taxes, under terms and conditions it considers
appropriate, including payment of a reasonable collection fee for the collection of the
hotel occupancy tax authorized by this Section.
(3) The district may solicit and accept additional voluntary contributions and
grants to further the purposes of the district.
* * *
Section 2. This Act shall become effective on July 1, 2026; if vetoed by the governor
and subsequently approved by the legislature, this Act shall become effective on July 1,
2026, or on the day following such approval by the legislature, whichever is later.